Turret: A small tower rising above and resting on one of the main towers, usually used as a lookout point.
Luce: The heraldic term for the pike (fish).
Lettice: A species of fur of a pale gray shade.
Scaffolding: The temporary wooden framework built next to a wall to support both workers and materials.
Hexagram: A charge formed of two interlaced triangles, one of them inverted; also known as the star of David or the seal of Soloman.
Pelagian: relating to the heresy of Pelagius (c. 354-419), who denied the transmission of original sin and emphasized the primacy of human endeavor in achieving salvation.
Cellarer: Official of a monastery responsible for food supplies.
Alkanet: a group of plants whose roots give off a red dye; used primarily as a coloring agent, but according to some early herbalists, "it helps old ulcers, hot inflammations, and burnings by common fire."
Knapped-flint: flint split for walling.
Umbo: The boss of a shield.
Barred: Striped.
Replevy: To return distrained goods to their owner by process of law.
Sabatons: Broad-toed solerets that came into use in the fifteenth century.
Collegiate Church: a church served by a corporation or college of clergy, of which a cathedral is one type.
Mammelieres: Steel roundels with staples fastened on either side of the breastplate. Chains depended from them to secure the helmet, sword, or misericorde.
Workings: A large part of the work on the demesne land was done by the serf-tenants as part of their yearly payment for the lands they held of the manor, the tenant being in some grants required to provide the labor of one man, in other grants, of two men. About 1230, we find a piece of meadow near Oxford held by payment of quit-rent and by the ploughing of 1 acre. Such services were extremely common in hay-time and harvest. The Latin name for a day's work on these conditions was precaria. By old agreement or custom, the lord of the manor provided the laborer with his food on certain precariae, which were therefore called siccae. On other work-days, the lord provided both food and drink, and these were non siccae.
Tippet: Pendant streamer from the hood or from the arm; also a shoulder cape.
Eastern Crown: A crown consisting of triangular segments on a headband.
Range: block of buildings.
Manorial Privileges: One of the fullest recitals of the formula concerning manorial privileges granted to Godstow Abbey may illustrate these formulae. At Broad Blunsdon Roger of Writele conveys "all his londes and tenementis . . . with mansions, bildyngis, gardens, culverhowses, mylles, fre tenauntes, bondemen (villenagis or bonde holdes), with ther sequelis and catallis, coterellis, rentis, workyngis, helpis, wardis, relefis, eschetis, al maner fynes of londes, redempcions or ayene-biyngis of progenitours or fadirs-afore, medis, fedyngis, pastures, pondis, suits of courtis, with all other liberties or fredoms and fre customes longyng to the forsaid tenementis."
Rape: The Sussex equivalent of a Hundred.
Synod: a council, or assembly, of the clergy.
Lights: The spaces between the mullions of a window.
Visor: Part of the helmet protecting the face pierced with slit or holes, moveable, usually pivoted at each side. In heraldry the position of the visor denotes the rank of the bearer.
Buttery: Room for the service of beverages.
Entry Fee: Payment by a tenant as a condition for admission to a holding.
Auxiliary: In military usage, a soldier recruited from a foreign territory.
Brichette: Armor for loins and hips.
Lozenge: A charge consisting of a rhombus standing on its point.
Sequestrator: the diocesan official appointed to take charge of estates or other property on which dues were owed to the bishop.
Cabasset: A steel cap resembling the morion.
Sacramentary: a type of liturgical book used in the early Middle Ages, containing the prayers said by the celebrant of the mass and the other sacrament. The lessons and the verses sung by the choir were contained in separate books.
Orders: the various grades of the Christian ministry, viz. the four minor orders of acolyte, lector, exorcist, and doorkeeper; and the three major orders of priest, deacon, and subdeacon.
Joust: A context between two knights on horseback, bearing lances.
Bar: An ordinary which runs horizontally across the shield like a fess, but narrower than the latter.
Greaves: Plate armor to protect the shins.
Rising: Used of a bird with its wings open, ready for flight.
Pheon: An arrowhead in heraldry.
Pone: A writ, whereby an action could be removed form the county court into the royal court.
Cuissards: Leg armor, comprising cuisses and knee cops and jambs.
Preceptory: a house of the Knights Templars.
Portcullis: A vertically lowered gate consisting of horizontal and vertical bars, the latter pointed at the bottom.
Missal: a book containing the complete order of mass, including both the "ordinary" (unvarying parts) and the "proper" (the parts that varied according to the liturgical calendar). In the early Middle Ages the proper of the mass was distributed over a number of separate books, such as the lectionary which contained the lessons, and the gradual which contained the chants.
Infirmary: part of a monastery, commonly situated to the east of the main complex, with its own dormitory, chapel, and refectory, which housed the monks who were sick or who were too old and infirm to take part in the normal monastic round.
Elbow Cops: Elbow pieces of plate armor.
Catapult: Stone-throwing engine, usually employing torsion.
Collateral Shields: Before marshalling came into use, subsidiary coats of arms were often placed on separate shields by the side of, or round, the chief coat or "coat of name."
Apostate: term used to describe a person who leaves religious orders after making solemn profession. Considered a serious crime in the eyes of th Church, being not only a breach of faith with God but also with the founders and benefactors of the religious house.
Cinquefoil: A five-petaled figure, rose-shaped.
Ways, Paths: Rights of way were of considerable importance. Records indicate that people had to buy such access. For example, at the manor at Cassington, Godstow Abbey purchased land to make a way. In an exchange of lands, part of the bargain was for land to get access to the rest of the holding.
Mendicant Orders: begging orders, the general term for the orders of friars, so called because they refused to own corporate property and depended upon organized begging for their support.
Caputium: includes the hood and tippet or cape. Hood orignally covered the head but later dropped back upon the shoulders.
Tassets: Plates, usually lozenge-shaped, attached by strap and buckle to the taces to protect the upper or front surface of the thigh.
Polearm: Any of a number of weapons with a blade of some sort attached to a long pole for a handle.
Radiating Chapels: series of chapels projecting radially from an ambulatory or apse.
Ward: Courtyard or bailey.
Pax brede: a small plate or tablet (also known as an "osculatory"), with a handle on the back and with the image of Christ or of the Virgin on the front, to be kissed at mass by priest and congregation.
Abbey: a community of monks or nuns, ruled by an abbot or abbess. Usually founded by a monastic order. Abbeys oftne owe some form of feudal obligation to a lord or higher organization. They are normally self-contained.
Bufle: A coat of buff leather.
Escalade: Scaling of a castle wall.
Ungentle: Not befitting a gentleman.
Baselard: A curved dagger or anelace.
Dean: in early monastic use, a monk appointed by the abbot to supervise a group of ten brethren; in general ecclesastical use, the head of a cathedral chapter; also the senior priest and supervisor of a rural deanery.
Paten: a shallow circular dish, usually of silver, on which the consecrated bread is placed during the celebration of the Eucharist.
Tierced in Pairle: Divided into three in the form of a Y.
Newel staircase: spiral staircase.
Jack: A general term for a coat of defence, whether wadded or of mail; but also especially used for the inexpensive body-garment of the ordinary soldier, formed of small pieces of metal secured between two folds of leather, canvas, or some quilted stuff.
Pinfold (or Punfold): The lord's pound for stray animals.
Helmet: Diminutive of helm, than which it was lighter, and origianlly a vizorless defence. The helm was often worn over it.
Pinfold: A place for confining stray or impounded cattle, horses, etc; a pound.
Saltire: An ordinary consisting of a diagonal cross, the shape of the St. Andrew's cross.
Seisin: Legal possession of a property.
Southernwood: a shrubby fragrant plant with yellowish flowers and bitter-tasting leaves; it was used both as a culinary herb and in medicinal cures. "Boiled in barley meal it taketh away pimples," claims an early herbalist.
Gipon: Similar to the gambeson but eventually worn by itself and became the pourpoint.
Assize of bread and ale: Royal law fixing prices and standards. The statutory regulation of settling of the price of bread and of ale, with reference to that of grain, in accordance with the ordinance of 51 Henry III.
Bard (Barding): Armor for a horse.
Regular Clergy: clergy who are monks, living under a monastic Rule (regula), as opposed to secular clergy who live in the world and do not belong to a religious order.
Quintain: Dummy with shield mounted on a post, used as a target in tilting.
Undercroft: vaulted room (often a basement) below a more important building.
Stepped: progressively staggered.
Maunche: The sleeve of a lady's dress shown in a stylized manner.
Studium generale: a term of art, which appeared in the 13th century, denoting a school of universal status, used especially of universities. In canonical theory it indicated a privileged status which could only be conferred on a school by the pope. Its special mark was the right to its graduates to teach in any other school of Christendom without further examination.
Crown Valley: A coronet composed of eight inverted "shield-shapes" set about a rim.
Advocate: lay protector and legal representative of a monastery.
Order: series of concentric stages (e.g. shafts).
Early English: term applied to the style of Gothic architecture which flourished in England from about 1220 to 1280.
Honor: Great estate of a tenant-in-chief.
Breviary: a book containing the Divine Office (lessons, psalms, hymns, etc.) for each day.
Hall for hynds: Servants' hall.
Knight's Fee: In theory, a fief which provided sufficient revenue to equip and support one knight. This was approximately twelve hides or 1500 acres, although the term applies more to revenue a fief could generate than its size; it required about thirty marks per year to support a knight.
Charge: Any object used in heraldry.
Wavy: One of the lines of partition on a shield.
Man-at-Arms: A soldier holding his land, generally 60-120 acres, specifically in exchange for military service. Sometimes called a Yeoman.
Canonical Penance: periods of penitential discipline, usually expressed in days or years, imposed for various sins as set out in the ancient Penitentials.
Tallage: Annual tax levied by lord on villeins.
Agistment: a Church rate, or tithe, charged on pasture land.
Gynours: The servers of catapults and siege engines.
Unicorn: A mythical beast with an antelope's body, lion's tail and a bearded horse's head with a single horn on its forehead.
Marcher lord: Lord of a border district, such as the boundaries of Wales and Scotland.
keep: The inner stronghold of a castle, usually found in one of the towers.
Palatinate: In England, a county in which the tenant-in-chief exercised powers normally reserved for the king, including the exclusive right to appoint justiciar, hold courts of chancery and exchequer, and to coin money. The king's writ was not valid in a County Palatinte.
Latchet: The strap used to fasten a shoe or clog.
Chancel: part of a church to the east of the crossing, containing the main altar and choir.
Avens: the herb was used in salads and the root to impart a clovelike flavor to ale. Avens was considered "the blessed herb" and according to the Ortus Sanitatus (Garden of Health), printed in 1491, "If a man carries the root [of avens] about him, no venemous beast can harm him."
Bondman: Serf, q.v., villein.
White Powder: ground ginger blended with powdered sugar.
Corbel: stone projection from a wall, supporting a weight.
Base: The bottom third of the shield.
Crossfigill: an ascetic exercise practiced by Celtic monks, which involved standing in prayer for long periods with the arms outstretched in the form of a cross.
Ventail: The lower part of the visor when it is made in two parts.
Hundred: Administrative division of English shire. Subdivision of a Shire. Theoretically equaled one hundred hides but hardly ever does. Generally had its own court which met monthly to handle civil and criminal cases. In Danish it was called a wapentake.
Croft: Garden plot of a village house.
Guige: The strap by which a shield was hung round the neck.
Customs: These were very numerous. Lands and houses in villeinage, or held by any tenure which approached to what is afterward called copyhold, were strictly subjected to obligation to keep in good repair. Neglect of repairs was one of the breaches of manorial law which justified recall of the grant and re-entry of the lord into possession of the holding, however small the quit-rent which he held over it.
Pomeis: A green roundel.
Cellarium: store-house of a monastery.
Mullion: vertical bar dividing a window into lights.
Catharist: related to the dualist heresy of the Middle Ages which regarded the flesh and the world of physical phenomena as intrinsically evil.
Naiant: Used to describe a fish swimming across the shield.
Galilee: chapel or vestibule, usually enclosing the porch at the west end of the church.
Enterclose: a partition.
Gusset: Pieces of chain mail, tied with points to the "haustement" to cover those portions of the body not protected with plate armor; they were usually eight in number, i.e., for armpits, inner sides of elbows, knees and insteps.
Gradual: a book of antiphons.
Badge: An emblematic figure, especially placed on some prominent part of the clothing of servants and retainers, such as the breast, back, sleeve, etc., to show to what household they belonged; found also on flags, buildings, etc. A heraldic symbol, often combined with a motto, indicating status of one kind or another.
Monogram: A badge composed of different letters or initials.
Placing of Charges: Charges are described in such a way as to indicate their manner of placing on a field. Where three like charges are placed on a shield, two are always deemed to be in the chief and one in the base unless otherwise mentioned. Charges placed in a row across the middle of the shield are "in fess"'; vertically down the middle they are "in pale."
Helm: From the end of the twelfth century the word was confined to the great close calque which then came into use.
Castellan: Governor of a castle.
Synodal: a customary payment made to the bishop by his lower clergy on the occasion of a visitation or a synod.
Rood: a great cross, or crucifix, placed on the rood-beam in the chancel arch.
Bannertes: Those knighted on the field and entitled to carry banners.
Triple Mount: A charge usually placed at the bottom of the shield and serving as a base for the armorial design itself.
Stains: Mixed colors sometimes used in heraldry; the principal stains are murrey (mulberry color), sanguine (blood red), and tenne (orange).
Floriated: decorated with flowery patterns.
Barre: French term for bend sinister.
Court of Common Pleas: A common law court to hear pleas involving disputes between individuals. Almost all civil litigation was within its term of reference, as was supervision of manorial and local courts.
Prelates: general term applied to the leading members of the ecclesiastical establishment.
Escheats: The right of a feudal lord to the return of lands held by his vassal, or the holding of a serf, should either die without lawful heirs or suffer outlawry.
Taces: The skirt of plate from waist to mid-thigh.
Infirmarian: officer of a monastery in charge of the infirmary.
Nave: part of a church to the west of the crossing.
Allerion: An eagle displayed but without beak and legs.
Tincture: The generic term for the colors of the heraldic palette, including the metals and furs.
Wheel Window: circular window with radiating tracery resembling spokes. 
Prime: a liturgical office sung or recited at the first hour of the day, i.e., at sunrise.
Paterae: flat circular or oval ornamentation.
Clarion: An old musical instrument.
Stole: a narrow strip of embroidered silk or linen, worn over other vestments to hang round the neck and down the front of the celebrant at mass.
Agumentation: An addition made to arms, often to commemorate a special achievement or event.
Bouche: The hole cut in the corner of the shield through which to point the lance; also the circular hole in the vamplate.
Langued: Almost all heraldic beasts have their tongues done in a different color, and this is known as langued.
Quatrefoil: a very common Gothic architectural ornament in which four arcs are divided by cusps, rather in the form of a four.
Suits of Court: Suit of Court meant that the tenant was bound to attend, and to serve as juryman, in the manorial courts, or to purchase exemption. Originally the court met every third week, and tenants were bound to attendance at all meetings. In time, the meetings became less regular, but tenants were bound to attend whenever summoned. Tenants often bargained for a minimum of attendance. Apart from the Court Baron was the Court Leet, which met at least once a year, on a day (fixed by the custom of the manor) in Eastertide or Whitsuntide. The Court Leet represented a measure of the king's authority, delegated to the lord of the manor. It controlled brewers, bakers, butchers, shoemakers, and other tradesmen; judged and punished cases of larceny, assault, and breach of the peace; punished persons who obstructed roads or blocked rights of way, or neglected to repair roads or bridges.
Cope: a semicircular piece of silk or other cloth, worn by ecclesiastical persons in processions, at vespers and on other occasions.
Arest de lance: Vamplate, later the lance-rest.
Apsidal: apse-shaped.
Guardian: in the Franciscan Order the superior of a friary.
Affeer: To settle the amount of an amercement, to assess.
Oriel: Projecting room on an upper floor.
Adargue: A heart-shaped buckler.
Pean: A variant of ermine composed of gold ermine spots on black.
Judge-delegate: a prelate commissioned by the pope to hear and determine an ecclesiastica case locally in its country of origin.
Slype: passage.
Chamomile: any of several plants of the aster family, with scented leaves and small daisylike flowers; the dried leaves and flowers were used in herbal cures, and Boorde recommends rubbing the body with oil of chamomile to cure palsy.
Martyrology: a list of the martyrs, read during the office of Prime.
Guilds: Term applied to trade associations. The aims of such groups was to protect members from the competition of foreign merchants and maintain commercial standards. The first guilds were merchant guilds; later came craft guilds. Guilds maintained a system of education, whereby apprentices served a master for five to seven years before becoming journeymen at about age nineteen. Journeymen worked in the shop of a master until they could demonstrate to the leaders of the guild their ability to be made masters.
Dotterel: the European plover, a short-billed shore bird.
Passant Gardant: Walking past, but turning the head so as to show the full face.
Bliant: A garment worn by both sexes, said by some authorities to resemble the surcoat.
Corrodian: lay person who had obtained the right to board and lodging in a monastery, usually by payment of a down payment at an earlier date.
Porticus: the side-chapels common at Anglo-Saxon minster churches, frequently used for the more important burials.
Damson: sometimes called bullace, this bluish black plum is named for the place of its origin, Damascus.
Rail: a small wading bird resembling the crane.
Over All: Used of a charge which is superimposed on several other charges.
Statant: In heraldry, a standing figure.
Chief Shield: A practical term for a large shield quartered, bearing one or more inescutcheons.
Flighted: Used of the feathers of an arrow, as far example when they are of a different color.
Shilling: Measure of money used only for accounting purposes and equal to 12 pennies.
Paruchia: in the usage of the Celtic Church, the area and the churches, including distant territories, over which a monastery had spiritual jurisdiction.
Mantling: The decorative piece of material attached to the helmet and covering the back of the neck.
Chevron: Norman zigzag decoration.
Assize: meeting of feudal vassals with the king. Also refers to decrees issued by the king after such meetings.
Burgess: the holder of land or house within a borough.
Proper: In heraldry anything depicted in its natural color.
Tally, Tally-stick: Reeve's method of accounting for manor's production, deliveries, receipts, and expenditures; notched stick on which it was kept. The stick was split in two, one half being kept by the seller and the other half by the receiver.
Meurtriere: Arrow loop, slit in battlement or wall to permit firing of arrows, or for observation.
Splints: Overlapping plates defending the inside of the elbow.
Lavatorium: trough with running water where monks washed their hands before meals.
Lunel: A group of four half moons with their tips turned toward one another.
Chrism: holy oil; a mixture of olive oil and balsam used in Christian ritual.
Small Holder: A middle class peasant, farming more land than a cottager but less than a villein. A typical small holder would have 10-20 acres.
Deacon: assistant to the priest and next under him in rank, being a member of the third order of the minstry.
Benefice: A place where bran is bolted (sifted) from flour.
Genuillieres: Knee-guards. First made of cuir-bouilli, afterwards of steel.
Furs: Generic term for the stylized representation of animal pelts in heraldry.
Dooms: Judgments or decisions made formally by the suitors or the jury of the Manor Court.
Springer: the point at which an arch unites with its pier, wall.
Barbed: Used to refer to points of arrows and spears and the sepals of a rose.
Compartment: The ground on which supporters sometimes stand.
Bufe: A movable bevor used with an open casque.
Skirret: a species of water parsnip not available in this country and no longer cultivated on a large scale in Europe. Gerard declares that "these roots [may] be eaten boiled, with vinegar, salt, and a little oyle, after the manner of a sallad, and oftentimes they be fried in oyle and butter, and also dressed after other fashions, according to the skill of the cooke, and the taste of the eater."
Pittancer: An officer of a religious house who had the duty of distributing charitable gifts or allowances of food.
Norman: term applied to the style of architecture which flourished in England from about 1050 to about 1200.
Byrnie: A mail shirt, the precursor of the hauberk. It was often covered with small metal plates.
Rents: By this word is meant chiefly quit-rents, small fixed yearly payments in virtue of which freeholders held their lands of the manor, and similar payments in money or in kind exacted from those serfs' holdings which afterward became copyholds. At King's Clere, Hampshire, we have a rent of two fat hens at Martinmas and another rent of 4 horseshoes.
Orphrey: gold or other rich embroidery applied either to ecclesiastical vestments or to articles of lay attire.
Banded Mail: Mail formed by rings through which a leather thong was passed horizontally on the hauberk.
Wardens of Autumn: Officials appointed by the villages to help supervise harvest work.
Anchoret (Anchorite, Anchoress: a hermit, or recluse.
Seneschal: Chief official of an estate, supervisor of the lord's manor.
Parapet: Protective wall at the top of a fortification, around the outer side of the wall-walk.
Familia: the household establishment of a bishop or abbot, consisting of his clerks and domestic servants.
Verjuice: the juice of green or unripened fruits such as grapes and (more commonly) crab apples; a popular ingredient in cookery which often replaced vinegar. A medieval source gives instructions for making verjuice: "Gather crabbs as soon as the kernels turn blacke, and lay them in a heap to sweat and take them into troughs and crush with beetles [heavy wooden mallets]. Make a bagge of coarse hair-cloth and fill it with the crabbes, and presse and run the liquor into Hogsheads."
Feudalism: Medieval social and political system by which the lord-vassal relationship was defined.
Claustral: pertaining to the cloister.
Antiphoner: a choir-book containing the liturgical chants used in singing the canonical hours.
Free tenants: Free tenants were not only personally free, but their lands were held by money quit-rents, without obligation to do regular work on the demesne land of the lord. In these deeds, transfers of property generally mention the number of freeholds and the amount of their quit-rents.
Toft: Yard of a village house.
Mortuary: Death duty paid by villein to parish priest from the estate of a deceased parishioner, usually second-best beast or chattel.
Rere-dorter: building containing the monastic latrines, so called because it was usually situated at the back or far end of the dormitory.
Precentor: a cathedral dignitary responsible for the choir and the liturgical functions in the cathedral church.
Moneyer: A person licensed by the crown to strike coins, receiving the dies from the king, and keeping 1/240 of the money coined for himself.
Riparies": Every right to the fish in a stream or pond was carefully guarded by the landholder entitled to it. Under pre-Reformation regime, freshwater fish were of great value. An indication of this significance may be attested: when a water-mill is mentioned, express notice is taken of its fishing rights. Even meadows have their fishing rights reckoned into their value.
Semy: A field is described as semy when it is strewn with small charges.
Nimbus: sections of the office of Matins. In the monastic office each Nocturn consisted of three Psalms followed by four lessons; on important festivals Matins comprised three such Nocturns and thus included twelve lessons. In medieval texts Matins is commonly called Nocturns.
Dyches: Every right to the fish in a stream or pond was carefully guarded by the landholder entitled to it. Under pre-Reformation regime, freshwater fish were of great value. An indication of this significance may be attested: when a water-mill is mentioned, express notice is taken of its fishing rights. Even meadows have their fishing rights reckoned into their value.
Peculiar: term for a parish or other area not subject to the jurisdiction of the bishop within whose diocese it is situated, but subject to the jurisdiction of a bishop or some other ecclesiastical body in another diocese.
Alemele: The lame or blade of the sword. (Fr.)
Vamplate: A circular shield through which the tilting and war lances were fixed above the grip.
Minor Orders: the four lesser orders to which a man might be ordained, i.e., those of acolyte, lector, exorcist, and doorkeeper, as opposed to the three major orders of priest, Minister-general - the head of the Franciscan or Friars Minor.
Confraternity: association with a monastic community granted to the member of another monastery or to a lay person, conferring a special commemoration in the prayers of the community and a share in its spiritual privileges.
Alb: a full-length white linen garment, with sleeves and girdle, worn by the celebrant at mass under a chasuble.
Tithe (praedial) : a tax, payable to the rector, of the tenth part of all agrarian produce.
Spikenard: an aromatic plant of northern India whose root was used in the preparation of medicinal ointments for curing bruises; the very smell of the plant was said to destroy fleas.
Sergeant: Servant to accompanied his lord to battle. Also meant a type of tenure in service of a nonknightly character owed to a lord. Such persons might carry the lord's banner, serve in the wine cellar, make bow and arrows. Sergeants paid the feudal dues of wardship, marriage, and relief but were exempt from scutage.
Mentonieres: Plate armor protecting the throat and chin, attached to the breastplate.
Quintupal Mount: A triple mount surmounted by two single mounts.
Poleyus: Overlapping foot-plates.
Pytel: A small field or enclosure; a close.
Marriage and Dower: In the manorial sense, the term is mentioned in various manorial formulae. A serf might not marry without licence of his lord, and he might not give his daughter in marriage without licenses; and for this license a fee was charged. The term marriage in early times denoted lands belonging to the wife in her own name, given to her by her kin. Dower more properly denoted her rights over her husband's property acquired at their marriage. These rights were of two kinds. In some cases, the amount of the jointure which the widow should enjoy was determined by a special gift, made by the husband according to old custom at the door of the church on coming out from the wedding. In the absence of such special provision, the widow was entitled, for her widowhood, to a third part of her husband's lands.
Retable: an altar-piece; a painting, or frame holding sculptures, fixed to the back of an altar.
Hauberk: A tunic of iron rings interlinked.
Greek cross: a plain cross, the four limbs of which are of equal length.
Bainbergs: Armor for the lower part of the leg.
Crypt: chamber underneath a church, usually at the east end.
Jambarts: Shin and calf plates.
buffet: Traditional blow administered to the newly made knight at his dubbing.
ost: Feudal military service in the lord's army.
Tyger: The heraldic tyger is similar to the antelope but with a lion's body and no horns. The natural tiger is usually called a Bengal Tiger.
Fief: Land or revenue-producing property granted by a lord in return for a vassal's service.
Rector: in medieval canon law the incumbent of a parish who is entitled to receive the great tithe. Where a parish church had been appropriated to a monastery, the monastery became the corporate rector of the church.
Canon: a lawyer trained in canon law (the law of the Church).
Neophyte: a novice or new recruit.
Daub: A mud of clay mixture applied over wattle to strengthen and seal it.
Provost: Feudal or royal magistrate.
Gris: Gray fur from the martin, next in value to ermine and sable, worn by well-to-do middle classes.
Mort Dancestor: A pleading in a royal court, concerning claims by an heir that another had usurped his rightful succession to a free tenement at the death of the parent.
Vestry: small chamber attached to the chancel or transept of a church, in which the ecclesiastical vestments were kept and put on.
Gavelkind: The name of a form of land-tenure whereby a man's property was divisible among his sons.
Lunette: semicircular opening in a wall to support arch-braces, struts and rafters.
Chapter: the daily assembly of a monastic community at which a chapter of the Rule was read, faults were confessed, and business was transacted. Also the term for a body of clergy serving a cathedral.
Maniple: a strip of silk, or other fine-stuff, worn over the left arm of the celebrant at mass.
White Grease: lard.
Morion: A steel cap, with curved brim and high comb.
Ordinal: a service-book, with instructions to the priest on the order of services through the ecclesiastical year.
Aumbry: a locker or cupboard of some kind, usually placed in the north chancel wall, for the safe-keeping of service-books and sacramental vessels.
Targe: A small circular shield.
Ringed Mail: Formed of flat rings sewn side by side on a tunic of leather or quilted linen.
Church-Scot: An offering of threshed corn at Martinmas (November 11, often assigned to the vicar as part of his stipend. The ceremony of presenting gifts by laying the gift, or the deed conferring it, on the altar is often referred to. In one place the writer notes that the object of the ceremony was to ensure the undisputed possession of it to the church by bringing its violation under the provisions of greater excommunication.
Messuage: House and yard.
Warming-house: the only room in a monastery (apart from the infirmary and kitchen) where a fire was allowed.
Novice: a member of a monastic community under training who has not yet taken vows.
Week-work: Principal labor obligation of a villein, comprising plowing and other work every week throughout the year.
Turnsole: a plant cultivated primarily for its use as a purple dye.
Heater-shaped Shield: A triangular shield with curved sides, shaped like a flat-iron heater.
Curia Regis: English royal council and court of justice.
Palisade: A sturdy wooden fence usually built to enclose a site until a permanent stone wall could be erected.
Apse: semicircular or polygonal terminal of the chancel at its eastern end, terminating the chancel.
Label: A narrow bar with tabs or points pendant from it. A label of three points across the top of a shield is the distinguishing mark of the eldest son.
Refectory: the dining hall of a monastery.
Corporal: a linen square on which the consecrated elements are placed during the celebration of the Eucharist.
Bracer: A leather wrist guard used by archers of the long-bow.
Slipped: In heraldry used to describe the stalk of a flower.
Inverted: Used of a charge turned 180 degrees from its normal position.
Peytral: The breastplate for a horse.
Commendam: in the late Middle Ages, the practice of granting the headship of a monastic house as a perquisite to a secular clerk or bishop.
Gablet: small gable, often for decoration only.
Nebuly: One of the lines of partition.
Epaulieres: Pieces of armor covering shoulders.
Points: ties, laces.
Bordure: A band running round and touching the edge of the shield.
Bend Sinister: A band running diagonally across the shield from dexter base to sinister chief.
Clary: a plant of the sage family which cuts the grease of fatty meats and fish; in the late Middle Ages, its name was thought to mean "clair-ye" (clear eye) and ointments prepared with the herb were believed to sharpen vision. The early clary wine, a white wine so named for its clarity, is the etymological ancestor of our modern claret.
Hide: Tax assessment unit of land area, varying in size, theoretically 120 acres, although it may vary between 60 and 240 acres. It is by custom the land that can be cultivated by one eight-ox plow in one year.
Heriot: Death duty, usually "best beast" or other chattel, paid to lord. This was the lord's claim to the best beast owned by a deceased serf. In lieu of it, land was sometimes subjected to a money-payment, the heriotable fine. Generally, if a tenant dies in battle the heriot is forgiven.
Tansy: a bitter medicinal herb whose juice was traditionally extracted from the young leaves, mixed with eggs, and baked as a "tansy cake" (or simply a "tansy"). These cakes were thought to purify the body and were often eaten after Lent to counteract the effects of fasting fare.
Temporalities: the landed estates and other properties belonging to a church or religious body, especially the estates of a bishopric, in respect of which the bishop owed secular duties to the king.
Frankpledge: Police system by which every member of a tithing over the age of twelve was responsible for the conduct of every other member.
Clerestory: upper stage of church elevation, above the aisle roofs, usually pierced by windows.
Chibol: a type of small onion no longer cultivated.
Vicar General: an ecclesiastical officer appointed by the bishop as his deputy in matters jurisdictional and administrative.
Gyronny: Used of a shield that is divided into at least six triangular segments (gyrons) by lines radiating from the center.
Bill: A weapon with scythe-like blade and six-foot shaft.
Dunster: A broad cloth made in Somerset, known early in the 14th century
Hobilar: A light cavalry soldier. Perhaps so called from his wearing a hobille, i.e., a quilted jack, or gambeson, instead of metal armor; more probably from his riding a hobby, or small horse.
Capitals: head of a column.
Hue-and-cry: Criminal apprehension system by which all within earshot were required to give chase to the malefactor.
Bastion: A small tower at the end of a curtain wall or in the middle of the outside wall.
Sinister: The heraldic term for left.
Housesteads: Forts strategically placed on a craggy precipice.
Orach: a garden plant with red and green leaves used as a vegetable and a salad herb.
Dead angle: An angle, the ground contained by which cannot be seen by the defenders, and is therefore indefensible.
Teal: any of a large group of small, short-necked, fresh-water ducks.
Palisade Crown: A coronet composed of pointed stakes about a rim, similar to crown valley.
Lauds: the service of the divine office immediately following Matins. Sometimes it is confusingly called "Matins" in medieval texts. It was observed about 3 a.m.
Lombardy Mustard: a paste prepared by combining ground mustard seed with honey, wine, and vinegar.
Matins: the first office of the day, sung during the night about midnight, commonly called the Nocturns in medieval texts.
Arcade: row of arches, usually supported on colums.
Escarbuncle: A wheel usually consisting of eight ornamental spokes radiating from a central boss and terminating in fleurs-de-lis.
Lenten veil: covering pictures and crucifixes during Lent.
Atilt: The position in which the lance was held in charging.
Culdee: Celtic monks of Scotland and Ireland who flourished from the eighth to the fourteenth centuries, but who were mostly absorbed by the Augustinian canons from the twelfth century.
Transepts: transverse portions, north and south, of a cross-shaped church.
Custumal: Document listing obligations and rights of tenants.
Jambs: Plate armor to protect the shins.
Nativi: Persons of servile birth.
Baron: noble of high rank, in England a tenant-in-chief, holding his lands directly from the king.
Pileus: the distinctive head-dress of doctors, round or square. The square shape was made of four different pieces of material joined, wit a small point at the top. Eventually became the mortar-board of modern university garb. Small point of the original pileus became the modern tassel.
Field: The plain ground on which a coat of arms is painted.
Coif-de-mail: Hood of chain mail worn under iron hat of war. A close-fitting skull cap, usually made of metal and sometimes padded.
Occularium: The eye slit in the helm.
Carucate: a measurement of land, equal to a hide; usedin Danelaw.
Curtain: Those portions of a fortified wall which connect adjacent flanking-towers.
Drawbridge: A heavy timber platform built to span a moat between a gate house and surrounding land that could be raised when required to block an entrance.
Gorged: Used of an animal wearing a collar, which may be a plain collar or also a wreath or a crown. The unicorn of Scotland is gorged with a crown.
Hock Day: The second Tuesday after Easter Sunday; in former times an important term-day, on which rents were paid, Hock-day and Michaelmas dividing the rural year into its summer and winter halves.
Trick: To indicate the tinctures of a coat of arms by letters; from the Dutch trekken, to delineate.
Denization: royal charter of naturalization.
Dimidiate: Cut in half; often used of two coats each halved vertically, the dexter side of one being impaled by the sinister side of the other.
Ballflower: decorative motif consisting of three petals enclosing a ball; common in the early fourteenth century.
Suit of mill: The obligation of tenants to resort to a special mill (usually that of their lord) to have their corn ground.
Yale: A very English monster, a goatlike creature with teeth like a boar, feet like a unicorn, and spots of various colors (renowned as a supporter in the arms of John Beaufort, legitimate bastard of John of Gaunt).
Balandrana: A wide cloak worn by travellers in the 13th and 14th centuries.
Tympanum: space between the lintel of a doorway and the arch above it.
Free Tenement: A term of wide meaning since it included tenures such as knights' fiefs, urban burgages, and the holdings of free peasants.
Cronal: The crown-shaped steel tip of a jousting lance.
Bailiff: The lord's chief official on the manor.
Lantern: A small open turret placed on a roof as an outlet for smoke.
Mills: The obligation of tenants to have their grain ground at the lord's mill is universally known. It was enforced by fines imposed in the Court Baron of the land. Thus, in the Court Rolls of Great Waltham manor, Essex, belonging to the Earl of Essex in Edward I's reign, we have a fine of 6s. taken "de pluribus custumariis ville quia non molaverunt ad molendinum comitis." We find that by old custom the miller was expected to grind corn for use of the lord's household free of charge.
Sulong: A measurement of land in Kent. Equal to two hides.
Rerebrace: Armor of plate for the upper arm.
Jamb: straight side of a doorway or window.
merchant gild of a: The name of a form of land-tenure whereby a man's property was divisible among his sons. Also customary free tenure in Kent.
Brigandine: Metal splints sewed upon canvas, linen, or leather and covered with similar materials; a material used in making light armor. A pair of brigandines is a body-coat of this material, in two pieces.
Fusil: An elongated lozenge.
Curlew: a large brownish wading bird.
Arming Sword: Short sword worn on the right side.
Caltrap: A charge derived from a kind of iron spike strewn on the ground to impale horses' hooves.
Sandalwood: the pulverized wood of an East Indian tree used primarily to color food dark red.
Felony: In feudal law, any grave violation of the feudal contract between lord and vassal. Later it was expanded in common law to include any crime against the King's peace and came to mean any serious crime
Dreng: The name given to a free peasant in Northumbria and sometimes in Yorkshire and Lancashire. The name usually implies that land is held in return for military services.
Outer Curtain: The wall which enclosed the outer ward.
Finial: A slender piece of stone used to decorate the tops of the merlons.
Easter Sepulcher: a recess, or structure, on the north side of a chancel, used at Easter in the setting up of a representation of the burial of Christ; but often merely a temporary wooden erection.
Oblate: a person given in childhood to a monastic community by his parents, to be brought up as a monk.
Crossing: part of a church between the transepts.
Barbican: fortification defending the gateway to a castle.
Double-queued: Having two tails. This occurs almost exclusively with lions and was characteristic of a number of arms in the classical period of heraldry (e.g., those of Bohemia and Limburg).
Baton: A bendlet couped; when borne from sinister chief to dexter base it is a mark of bastardy.
Flaunches: The lateral thirds of a shield. English heraldic flanks are arched.
Urinant: Used to describe a fish when plunging head downward.
Destrier: A war horse.
Lector: "reader," i.e., one who has been ordained to the minor church of lector; in a monastery, a monk entrusted with reading the lessons in church or in the refectory.
Melusine: A young maiden with long hair and a fish tail (i.e., a mermaid)
Plate: Armor of steel plates as opposed to Mail, or armor composed of steel rings interlocked. In heraldry a silver roundel.
Essoin: Excuse for non-attendance in court, or delay permitted a defendant. Essoins might even be granted for dead people. In The White Book of London, 1419, we read "And they must cause the names of such as are deceased to be distinctly and openly briefed, that so they may be safely essoined at the gate of the Tower of London. . . ."
Naifty: The state of being born in bondage or serfdom.
Rubble: A random mixture of rocks and mortar.
Gudgeon: a small European fresh-water fish of the carp family.
Consistory Court: an ecclesiastical court, appointed by a bishop or archbishop, with jurisdiction extgending to both clergy and laity.
Toll: Payment for leave to sell livestock.
Manumission: The act by which a lord free a serf.
Leet: The term was used for a subdivision of land in Kent equivalent to a hundred.
Glebe: Land assigned to support the parish church.
Hayward: Lessor manorial official; assistant to reeve.
Frater: refectory.
Blaunderelle: a variety of white apple. According to Boorde, apples "doth comforte the stomacke, and doth make good dygestyon, specyally yf they be rostyd or baken."
Pentagram: Five-pointed version of the seal of Solomon.
Wardship: The right of a feudal lord to the income of a fief during the minority of its heir. The lord was required to maintain the fief and to take care of the material needs of the ward. When the ward came of age, the lord was required to release the fief to him in the same condition that it was received.
Cargan: A collar or gorget or mail.
Placcards: Small steel plates used to strengthen the breastplate and (in the singular) also used to describe the stomacher worn by men and women at the close of the fifteenth century.
Devise: The French term for a badge.
Ordinaries: A term used to refer to certain basic geometric charges such as the pale, fess, chevron, chief, cross, bend, and saltire.
Tuilles: Similar to little brayettes.
Suit of Mill: The obligation of tenants to resort to a special mill (usually that of their lord) to have their corn ground.
Gipciere: A leather pouch , attached to the girdle.
Placebo et dirige: the first words of the opening antiphons of Vespers and Matins respectively in the Office of the Dead; hence, in medieval usage a term denoting the entire Office of the Dead.
Baston: A mace or club with polygonally cut head.
Inner Curtain: The high wall that surrounds the inner ward.
Marlin: any of several large, slender deep-sea fishes related to the sailfish and spearfish.
Standard: A long tapering flag with the arms in the hoist and badges, crest, and motto on the fly.
Sext: the liturgical office sung or recited at the sixth hour of the day, i.e., about midday.
Host: Feudal military service in the lord's army.
Calver Salmon: exact meaning unknown; possibly refers to the fresh salmon sliced and prepared in a special way, perhaps pickled.
Stoup: a stone basin for holy water, usually placed near the main entrance of the church.
Sejant: In heraldry in reference to figures sitting down.
Commune Concilium: Norman equivalent of Anglo-Saxon Witan. Decision taking at such meetings, either judicial or military, were binding on the vassals.
Ram: Battering-ram.
Circle of Glory: A synonym for halo.
Gate House: The complex of towers, bridges, and barriers built to protect each entrance through a castle or town wall.
Gothic: general term used to describe the style of architecture which flourished in western Europe from the twelfth to the sixteenth centuries.
Regalian: Royal.
Free Chapel: a chapel founded by the king (often developing into a wealthy church), not subject to the jurisdiction of the bishop.
Displayed: A bird with wings outspread, tips upward. One also speaks of displaying arms.
Tithe: Payment to church, consisting of a tenth of produce.
Greek Wine: a generic term which relates to any sweet full-bodied wine.
Customal: A written collection or abstract of the customs of a manor.
Gauntlet: Gloves of a knight in plate armor, lined with leather.
Pulpitum: pulpit projecting from a wall. Also, in large churches, a stone screen dividing the nave and quire.
Chickweed: a weed with juicy stems and small white flowers; the juice of the chickweed was drunk to heal cramps, convulsions, and palsies.
Conventuals: the name given to that section of the Franciscan Order that accepted the need to modify the practice of absolute poverty enjoined by St. Francis, as as to build churches and permanent friaries.
Thwyrtel: Knife or dagger.
Truss: roof-timbers framed together to bridge a space.
Chapel-de-fer: Iron hat-of-war.
Amercement: Fine.
Pellet: A black roundel, also called an ogress or gunstone.
Chantry Chapel: chapel attached to a church, endowed for the saying of masses for the soul of the founder or another person (i.e., a wife or husband) nominated by the founder.
Solar: upper living-room in a medieval house.
Eucharist: the Communion, or Sacrament of the Lord's Supper: the central ceremony of the mass.
Surcoat: A garment worn over the armor to protect it from sun and rain, and usually blazoned heraldically.
Ballista: Engine resembling a crossbow, used in hurling missiles or large arrows.
Chaplain: Priest or monk in charge of the chapel and of the secretarial department of the castle.
Troper: a book of tropes, being the phrases or sentences added by a choir to embellish the mass.
Batter: A sloping part of a curtain wall. The sharp angle at the base of all walls and towers along their exterior surface.
Farm: A fixed sum, usually paid annually, for the right to collect all revenues from land; in effect, rent. Lords may farm land to vassals, receiving a fixed annual rent in place of the normal feudal obligation. Many sheriffs farmed out their shires, contracting in advance to pay a fixed annual sum to the crown, thus obtaining the right to collect any additional royal revenues for their own profit.
Stylite: an ascetic who lived on top of a pillar.
Tenebrae: the office of Matins and Lauds in the special form sung during the Wednesday, Thursday, and Friday of Holy Week, at which candles are extinguished one by one following each psalm.
Machicolation: A projection in the battlements of a wall with openings through which missiles can be dropped on besiegers.
Decretum: a common title for a collection of canon law, arranged thematically, in use from the 11th century onwards.
Habergeon: A short, light hauberk, of which the word is a diminutive; usually therefore of mail, but sometimes merely a plate for the defence of the throat and breast.
Super-arch: larger arch, often blank, enclosing two or more smaller arches.
Ombrello: An umbrella or canopy used as a sign of dignity in the church.
Triforium: intermediate stage in the elevation of a church wall, between the arcade and the clerestory, consisting of a blank arcading or a wall-passage.
Vervain: a medicinal plant of the verbena family, slightly bitter in taste. The name vervain is derived from the Celtic ferfaen, from fer (to drive away) and faen (a stone), as the plant was much used to soothe attacks of the bladder.
Nombril Point: A point situated between the fess point and the base of the shield.
Saw-tooth: decorated with serrations like a saw.
Proprietary Church: a church in private ownership, the property of a landlord or of a monastery-the condition of most rural churches in the early Middle Ages.
Benedictional: a liturgical book containing formulas for blessing of people and objects.
Capitulary: a compilation of episcopal or other statutes.
Rebeck: A musical instrument, having three strings, and played with a bow; an early form of the fiddle.
Benedictine Order: monastic order founded by St. Benedict. Monks take vows of personal poverty, chastity and obedience to their abbot and the Benedictine Rule.
Bise: A species of fur.
Beakhead: Norman decorative motif consisting of a row of beast or bird heads pecking.
Fess: A heraldic ordinary consisting of a wide horizontal bar across the central third of the shield.
Buskins: High boots worn by country folk and travellers. Also part of the King's Coronation Vestments and of the Vestments of the Bishop at High Mass.
Reeve: Principal manorial official under bailiff, always a villein.
Apaume: Hand or gauntlet, open and showing the palm.
Lintel: horizontal beam or stone bridging a fireplace, doorway, etc.
Chess Rook: A representation of the chess piece resembling the cronal of a lance.
Translation: in the case of a bishop, his transfer from one see to another, a change which in classical canon law could only be authorized by the pope. The term was also used to describe the process by which the bodily remains of a saint were removed from their tomb to a place of honor above or behind the altar of a church. Originally it was an act that signified canonisation; from the 13th century, it was a solemn act carried out following canonisation by the pope.
Terce: the liturgical office sung or recited at the third hour of the day, i.e., about 9 a.m.
Chevet: French type of east end of a church, comprising an apsidal chancel with ambulatory and radiating chapels.
Server: the celebrant's assistant at the altar during mass.
Chemise: Inner walled enclosure of a castle.
Beaver Chin-piece: So called from its resemblance to a bib. Protective piece covering the chin. It was usually attached to the bottom of the helmet, at times with a hinge.
Coenobitical: the term for monastic life in community, as opposed to the life of hermits.
Almoner: Official appointed to distribute alms.
Rampant Sinister: Rampant, but facing to the left side of the shield.
Inner Ward: The open area in the center of a castle.
Sokeman: Another name for a free villager.
Pennon: A pointed banner used by knights bachelor and esquires.
Demesne: The part of the lord's manorial lands reserved for his own use and not allocated to his serfs or freeholders. Serfs work the demesne for a specified number of days per week. The demesne may either be scattered among the serfs land, or a separate area, the latter being more common for meadow and orchard lands.
Burel Cloth: Coarse woolen cloth.
Enarme: The attachments at the back of a shield by which it could be held on the arm.
Antia: The handle of the buckler.
Burgundian Cross: A diagonal cross formed from two crossed branches.
Postulant: a person seeking admission to a religious order.
Cote-hardie: A tight-fitting tunic when worn by men, a long tight-fitting gown when worn by women.
Corrody: Old age pension, usually purchasable from a monastery, consisting of lodging, food, and incidentals.
Fletcher: A maker of arrows.
Provincial: or "provincial minister"; the superior in charge of a province of the Friars Minor; in the case of the Dominicans.
Salade: (Sallet, Salet) A helmet that rested entirely upon, and generally covered only the top half of, the head, and the rear of which tapered to a point and projected behind the head.
Reredos: a screen, usually carved and painted, behind and above the altar.
Nasal: The vertical nose-bar of a helmet.
Commissary: an officer representing the bishop in a part of his diocese and exercising jurisdiction there in his name.
Corium: Armor composed of leather.
Octofoil: An eight-leaved figure.
Prior: in an abbey the second-in-command or officer next in rank after the abbot; the superior of a religious house that did not have the status of an abbey.
Armed: Used to refer to the claws, talons, tusks, and suchlike of creatures when of a different tincture from the body. Also used of parts of the human body when encased in armor.
Roskyn: Squirrel fur.
Rampant: Rearing up; used of beast.
Grange: a monastic farm settlement at some distance from the abbey, supervised by a monk and staffed by lay brothers, created to cultivate one of the abbey's estates.
Bycocket: A hat turned up behind and down in front; when worn by kings it was circled with a crown.
Vambraces: Armor of plate for the lower arm.
Cantor: monk or clerk whose liturgical function is to lead the choir.
Secular Canons: the secular clergy serving a cathedral or collegiate church, as opposed to canons regular, who were clergy living under a monastic rule.
Harpy: A mythical creature with a vulture's body and the head and bust of a woman.
Livery: To be given land as a gift from the king. Also meant to be given the right to wear a lord's livery.
Diffinitors: a term used by the Cistercians and the Dominicans for those members of the general chapter who drafted legislation and steered the assembly.
Nesselblatt (Nettle Leaf): The German term for a charge formed using a zigzag bordure.
Crosier: bishop's pastoral staff. The word meant originally the bearer of a crook and is in no way connected with cross, though the words have been confused.
Collar-beam: horizontal beam tying two rafters together above the level of the wall-top.
Perpendicular: term applied to the style of Gothic architecture which flourished in England between about 1340 and about 1530.
Transom: horizontal bar across the lights of a window.
Evangelical Counsels: the recommendations found in the Gospels to embrace celibacy, poverty, and obedience, as a means to attain spiritual perfection, which formed the basis of the monastic life.
Outer Ward: The area around the outside of and adjacent to the inner curtain.
Placcates: Small steel plates used to strengthen the breastplate and (in the singular) also used to describe the stomacher worn by men and women at the close of the fifteenth century.
Compline: the last service of the day, being the final canonical hour, about 9 p.m.
Crocket: leaf-shaped decoration added to pinnacles, gables, capitals, etc.
Chevage: Payment, typically in kind, owed annually by villein living outside the manor.
Bastille: Redoubt or outwork.
Ordeal: A method of trial in which the accused was given a physical test (usually painful and dangerous) which could only be met successfully if he were innocent.
Pier: strong, upright support or pillar for arches, etc.
Bullace: a purple wild plum.
Legate: an ambassador, usually a cardinal, dispatched by the pope to a territory with plenary powers (some archbishops, including the archbishops of Canterbury, claimed to be legati nati or standing legates in virtue of their office).
Pyx: a vessel, usually a box, for holding the consecrated bread (the reserved Host).
Castle-guard: Feudal obligation to serve in the garrison of a castle, either for a period each year or during war.
Hatchment: A corruption of achievement but used solely to describe an achievement painted on a lozenge to indicate the death of the bearer. The way the background is colored indicates the marital status of the deceased.
Selions: A ridge or narrow strip lying between two furrows formed in dividing an open field.
Dorter: a monastic dormitory.
Caboshed: Used of the heads of certain animals when shown affronty and cut off clean behind the ears.
Bombasted: Stuffed with cotton, hair, etc.
Manual: a handbook of directions to the celebrant for the administration of the sacraments.
Sacristy: a small building, usually attached to the chancel or transept of a church, in which vestments and sacred vessels were kept.
Villein: The wealthiest class of peasant. Villeins usually cultivated 20-40 acres of land, often in isolated strips.
Fire-bote: The wood granted to the tenants by a lord for the purpose of fuel.
Arming Hose: Long hose worn under leg armor.
Casque: A helmet.
Justices of Oyer and Terminer: Justices on circuit commissioned to hear and complete pending cases.
Foil: leaf-like ornamentation in windows, etc.: trefoil, quatrefoil, cinquefoil, sexfoil, etc., represent the number of leaves.
Mesnie: Military personnel of a castle household.
Accidie: term used in ascetical literature for spiritual sloth, boredom, and discouragement.
Moat: An earthwork mound on which a castle was built.
Spirituals: the name given to that section of the Franciscans that refused to modify the instructions of St. Francis on absolute poverty and who consequently refused to possess permanent buildings, as opposed to the "Conventuals" who accepted the need to compromise in this respect.
Almond Milk: a cloudy liquid prepared by steeping ground almonds in water, broth, or wine; acts as the liquid base and/or thickening agent in a wide variety of medieval dishes. Its medicinal values are praised by Boorde, who claims that "it doth comforte the brest, and it doth mollyfye the bely, and provoketh uryne."
Tabard: a loose, usually sleeveless waistcoat, sometimes called a sclavine.
Rompu: Broken; used particularly of a chevron, the center broken and enhanced.
Sake: A right of jursidiction claimed by some manorial lords.
Vigils: in early monastic literature the term for Matins, i.e., the office sung during the watches of the night.
Pile: An ordinary consisting of a triangular wedge emerging from the chief, or, when reserved, the base.
chancellor: Priest or monk in charge of the chapel and of the secretarial department of the castle.
Vervelles: The staples on the bascinet to which the carvail was laced.
Ghibelline Battlements: Crenelations with dovetail-shaped notches on their upper edges.
Ramson: a kind of garlic with broad leaves; the root was used for salads.
Baguette: A lappet of mail (see Little Brayettes).
Plate-tracery: see Tracery.
Goutty: Covered with drops or gouttes.
String-course: projecting horizontal band of masonry set along a wall.
Obedientiary: a monk in charge of one of the administrative departments of a monastery, such as the cellerer, the sacrist, or the infirmarian.
Gore: Wedge of arable land created by irregularity of terrain and plowing in strips.
Transitional: term applied to the architecture of the late twelfth and early thirteenth centuries, during the transition from Norman or Romanesque to Gothic.
Denarius: The English silver penny, hence the abbreviation "d".
Snipe: a wading bird which lives in marshy places and is characterized by a long, flexible bill.
Stiff-leaf: foliage ornamentation consisting of many lobed shapes, common in the thirteenth century.
Hallmote: Manorial court.
Haurient: Used to describe a fish shown erect.
Borage: a blue-flowered plant with hairy leaves that taste somewhat like cucumber; used primarily in salads. "Borage," Boorde says, "doth comforte the herte, and doth ingender good bloode, and causeth a man to be mery."
Flying Buttress: arch carrying the thrust of a roof from the upper part of a wall to a free-standing support.
Diploma: technical term for an elaborate type of charter used in the early Middle Ages to confer land or privileges.
Lancet: slender window with pointed arch.
Ordinary: a high ecclesiastic, usually the bishop, entitled to exercise jurisdiction in his own right.
Bossoirs: The bosses on the peytral of a horse.
Mullions: The vertical divisions of stone or wood between the lights of windows.
Vassal: A free man who held land (fief) from a lord to whom he paid homage and swore fealty. He owed various services and obligations, primarily military. He was also required to advise his lord and pay him the traditional feudal aids required on the knighting of the lord's eldest son, the marriage of the lord's eldest daughter, and the ransoming of the lord should he be held captive.
Medlar: a small, brown, applelike fruit, hard and bitter when ripe and eaten only when partly decayed.
Naval Crown: A coronet composed of hulls and sails of ships set alternately about a rim.
Chevauchee (cavalcade): Feudal duty to accompany the lord on a minor expedition or as an escort.
Coute: Elbow-piece.
Formariage: Also called Merchet. The sum commonly paid by a serf to his lord when the serf's daughter marries a man from another manor.
Sextuple Mount: A quintuple mount with a sixth mount added on top.
Gambeson: A close-fitting, quilted tunic of defence, stuffed with wool, tow, rags, etc. Later called the gipon.
Chausses: Breeches of mail or other pliant armor for the lower leg and foot.
Introit: verses of Scripture, often from the psalms, sung at the beginning of the mass, varying according to the day of the year.
Arming Points: Small thongs of leather for tying the camail to the bascinet or the roundels to the armpit.
Galingale: an aromatic root; themain ingredient of galyntyne, a pungent medieval sauce. Boorde recommends galingale to "comforte the stomake."
Outfangenethef: The payment made to the lord for the privilege of feeding beasts in the woods about the village. This mainly refers to leave to pasture pigs in the woods during acorn season. For this a lord of a manor often exacted a payment for each pig turned out.
Cadency Marks: Marks by which the coats of arms of all kinfolk of blood, other than that of the head of the family, were distinguished therefrom and from each other.
Whelk: a large marine snail with a spiral shell.
Naissant: When one charge issues from the middle of another.
Nobility: The highest social class. There are particular crowns corresponding to the different grades of nobility.
Serf: Peasant burdened with week-work, merchet, tallage, and other obligations; bondman, villein. A semi-free peasant who worked his lord's demesne and paid him certain dues in return for the use of land, the possession (not owndership) of which was heritable. These dues, usually called corevee, were almost all in the form of labor on the lord's land. Generally this averaged to three days a week. Generally subdivided into classes called cottagers, small holders, or villeins although the latter originally meant a free peasant who was burdened with additional rents and services.
Lease for Three Lives: A term of lease of land, usually for the life of its holder, his son or wife, and a grandson.
Mullet: A five-pointed spur-rowel, or molet. In heraldry a star, normally of five points drawn with straight lines.
Adulterine Castle: a castle built without a person's liege lord's approval.
Assart: Tract of wasteland cleared or drained to be added to village arable. If the land belonged to a monastic manor, special provisions were made for payment of tithe-corn. From a deed of 1346, it would seem that the overlord could decide which church or religious house ws to receive the tithe.
Hake: any of various edible sea fishes resembling or related to the cod.
Quarrel: A bolt with a four-sided pyramidal head.
Interdict: papal ordinance debarring certain persons or the inhabitants of a certain place from participation in the sacraments, church offices and burial services. Ecclesiastical banning in an area of all sacraments except for baptism and extreme unction. In general it does not ban high feast days. Used to force persons/institutions/communities or secular lords to a view dictated by the church or pope.
Steward: Chief official of an estate, supervisor of the lord's manor.
Mensa: term used for that part of a monastic estate that was allocated to the direct support of the community and to supplying its table.
Tilting Helm: A large helmet worn over the other at tournaments.
Cyclas: A kind of military surcoat.
Poitrel: The breastplate for a horse.
Roach: a fresh-water fish of the carp family.
Impale: To place two coats side by side on a single shield, as in certain marital arms where the husband's coat is placed on the dexter and the wife's on the sinister half of the shield.
Segmental: in the form of a segment, or divided into segments.
Voided: In heraldry, with the center cut out.
Articulated: Constructed with overlapping plates.
Fleur-de-lis: A stylized form of lily; the emblem of the kings of France. Applied to a lance tip so shaped.
Bordar: a town with the right of self government granted by a royal charter.
Cognisance: Heraldic term for badge of a noble family.
Abjuration: renunciation, under oath, of heresy to the Christian faith, made by a Christian wishing to be reconciled with the Church.
Arming Doublet: Worn under the armor.
Prebend: the revenues, whether from land or tithes, granted to an ecclesiastic as his stipend.
Ensign: Place above, as of a crown resting on a rose.
Laver: an edible purple seaweed.
Lymphad: An ancient ship with a single mast. Often shown with flags flying, sail unfurled, and oars in action.
Scallop: decoration consisting of a series of truncated semi-Scapular - a rectangular piece of stuff hanging down from the shoulders before and behind. It has shoulder seams and a hole for the head to pass through.
Voyding Knife: A knife for disemboweling deer.
Aventaille: Breathing aperture in helmet, the earliest form of a visor.
Winged: With wings attached; used of animals and monsters.
Rose Hips: the fleshy, bright-colored fruit of the rose plant.
Rayfish: a fish with a horizontally flat back, both eyes on the upper surface, and a slender, whiplike tail.
Masoned: A charge representing masonry is said to be masoned. The joints between the blocks are assumed to be of the same shade in a darker tone otherwise blazoned.
Gonfanon: Small banner charged with a knight's coat-of-arms attached to his lance.
Harbourage: This privilege is mentioned with regard to monastic manors. It was probably house-room and entertainment for the superior or his representative when they made a tour of the estates. In some cases the grantor of property reserves to himself house-room in it when he needs it but promises to pay for his use of it.
Quire: the part of a church where services were sung, containing the choir-stalls.
Lectionary: a book containing the lessons to be read in choir during Mass and the divine office.
Sea-monsters: Often created in heraldry by attaching a fish's tail to the top half of a creature's body. The resulting hybrids are called sea-lions, sea-unicorns, etc.
admission: The name of a form of land-tenure whereby a man's property was divisible among his sons. Also customary free tenure in Kent.
Sedilia: seats for priests officiating at services, usually built into the wall on the south side of the chancel.
Gypciere: A hanging purse or pouch, from Fr. gibciere, a game-pouch, because originally used in hawking.
Suffragan: assistant (hence "suffragan bishop").
Cat: Assault tower.
Medale: A drinking festivity after the lord's meadows had been mowed.
Justiciar: The head of the royal judicial system and the king's viceroy or regent when absent from the country.
Capitular: of or pertaining to an ecclesiastical chapter.
Leat: a channel conveying water, usually to a mill.
Water Bouget: Symbolically depicted as two water bags pendant from a yoke.
Shire: English county.
Celestial Crown: A coronet composed of eight triangular points, each ensigned with a star and set about a rim.
Beadle: Manorial official, usually assistant to reeve.
Farce: stuffing; after the Middle Ages became the generic term for short dramatic pieces "stuffed" with buffoonery.
Clarified Honey: honey whose impurities have been forced to the top by boiling and removed by skimming. Many medieval recipes recommend clarifying honey by combining it with wine. As the wine fermented, a scum formed on top and the liquid became clear.
Pauldrons: Usually shoulder guards.
Acolyte: a clerk in minor orders whose particular duty was the service of the altar.
Reliquary: shrine or casket in which relics of saints were kept.
Bicorporate: Having two bodies conjoined to a single head.
Mark: A measure of silver, generally eight ounces, accepted throughout western Europe. In England it was worth thirteen shillings and four pence, two thirds of one pound.
Messor: An official appointed to oversee the manorial reapers and mowers.
Pellitory: a climbing plant of the nettle family whose leaves were used in salads and roots for medicinal cures. According to one herbalist, pellitory "is one of the best purges of the brain that grows. . .and an excellent remedy in lethargy."
Vespers: the liturgical office of the evening, otherwise called Evensong.
Purbeck marble: hard dark stone resembling marble, quarried from the Isle of Purbeck, Dorset.
Legenda: a legendary, or book of legends, concerning the lives of the saints.
Custodian: in the Franciscan Order, the head of a custody.
louvre: A small open turret placed on a roof as an outlet for smoke.
Arafe: A large brooch for fastening cloak or robe.
Florilegia: an anthology, especially one of patristic texts; such collections were widely used by medieval theologians.
Fitched: Pointed at the foot; used for crosses whose bottom arm ends in a point.
Closed Cape: a gown sewn down the front except or a short slit in the front middle which enabled hands to emerge, worn mostly by regents in theology, arts and law during lectures.
Virgate: Land unit theoretically sufficient to support a peasant family, varying between 18 and 32 acres.
Crenelation: A notched battlement made up of alternate crenels (openings) and merlons (square saw-teeth).
Exemption: a privileged status obtained by some monasteries which freed them from the jurisdiction of their local bishop and made them directly subject to the papacy.
Barm: the foamy yeast that appears on the top of malt liquors as they ferment; ale barm was commonly used as the yeast element in breads and batters.
Eagle: One of the commonest medieval charges on heraldic shields, often denoting imperial sovereignty.
Yardland: A peasant holding in the common fields, usually 25-30 acres of arable land with appurtenant meadow, pasture and common rights.
Gallery: intermediate story in the elevation of a church wall, between the arcade and the clerestory.
Canons Regular: communities of clergy following a monastic rule, especially the Rule of St. Augustine.
Dobbles: Probably molds or patterns on which armor was made (Old English).
Dragon: A scaly, four-legged monster with batlike wings and an eagle's claws.
Arrow Loop: A narrow vertical slit cut into a wall through which arrows could be fired.
Advowson: the right of nominating or presenting a clergyman to a vacant living.
Rood-screen: screen below a crucifix, usually at the west end of a church, so called because it was normally surmounted by a rood or crucifix.
Marshal: Household official in charge of the stables, later a royal officer.
Demi-jambes: Greaves.
Wreath: 1. A wreath consisting of twisted strips of material serves as a link between the crest and the helmet, particularly in English heraldry. 2. A wreath of leaves may be used to surround a charge on a shiled, which is then said to be "wreathed.""
Casuistry: a system of moral theology which takes full account of the circumstances and intentions of penitents and formulates rules for particular cases.
Tithingman: The chief man of a tithing.
Lined: Refers to the inside of a piece of material (e.g., an armorial cloak or helmet mantling).
Squint: the hole cut in a wall or through a pier to allow a view of the high altar from a place where it would not otherwise possible
Dagges: Ornamental cutting of the edges of garments, dating from around 1346.
Gersuma: Entry fee for taking possession of a tenancy.
Trefoil: A three-leaved figure usually slipped at the base.
At Gaze: A synonym for guardant but only applied to members of the deer species.
Debruised: Said of an animal charged on a shield and surmounted by an ordinary or other charge.
Pound Scots: Scottish unit of currency, worth 1s. 8d., used until the eighteenth century.
Wattle: A mat of woven sticks and weeds.
Capa: A hooded robe or mantle, also worn without hood.
Gurnard: a spiny-finned sea fish having a large head and winglike pectoral fins.
Coude: Elbow pieces of plate.
Octave: the eighth day, or the period of eight days counting inclusively, that followed a liturgical festival.
Double Tressure: Two narrow parallel lines forming a border within a shield. When interspersed with fleurs-de-lis on alternate sides it is termed "fleury counterfleury." This is a favorite charge in Scotland.
Collect: a short prayer appointed for a particular day (hence "collect-books").
Piscina: basin, usually set in the south chancel wall, for washing the chalice and paten at mass.
Harness: Armor. General term for a suit of armor that completely protected the body, including the limbs.
Misericorde: additional monastery refectory, in which the eating of meat was permitted.
Quinquagesima: the last Sunday before the beginning of Lent.
Irradiated: With rays of light issuing from a charge.
Cotter: Tenant of a cottage, usually holding little or no land.
Cygnet: a young swan.
Banalities: fees which a feudal lord imposes on his serfs for the use of his mill, oven, wine press, or similar facilities. It sometimes includes part of a fish catch or the preceeds from a rabbit warren.
Alarica: A heavy triangular-shaped spear.
Porret: a young leek or onion; a scallion
Barber Surgeon: the monk who shaves faces and heads and performs light surgery.
Coucher: a large book (hence "coucher-book", a large cartulary).
Braguett: Steel petticoat or skirt of overlapping bands. Little Brayettes, small plates added at bottom center front.
Cellerer: officer of a monastery entrusted with the general provisioning of the community.
Gestum: A guest's portion: an allowance of meat and drink.
Coterells: These were bondmen who held a small portion of land, a coteland or cotland.
Dittany: a plant of the mint family with oval leaves and clusters of purplish flowers; the pungent, aromatic leaves were used in salads and as a medicinal herb. The application of dittany combined with black soap was thought to aid in the extraction of "splint, iron, thorne or stub."
Chamberlain: Household official in charge of a lord's chamber.
Pourpoint: Double stuff, padded or quilted.
Scutage: The claim by the lord that each piece of land held of him shall pay a contribution when this tax is asked. We find, in the same way, the lord of a manor subjecting all holdings under the manor to payments of their share when the king imposed tallage, and in legal formulae the land remained nominally subject to this burden long after the impost had ceased to be made.
Chequy: A pattern of checks like a chessboard.
Bezant: A gold roundel representing a coin but usually shown plain and unstamped.
Lamprey: any of a group of eellike water animals with a funnel-shaped, jawless, sucking mouth; also called lamper eel.
Tracery: decorative openwork on the upper parts of a Gothic window. Bar-tracery and Geometric-tracery: both typical of the second half of the thirteenth century, consisting chiefly of foils within circles. Panel-tracery: typical of the period 1340-1530, consisting of straight-edge vertical panels.
Headland: Segment of land left at the end of plow strips for turning plow around.
Fee, Fief: Land granted by a lord in return for services. Habitable lands held under fedual tenure. Often called a Holding.
Jus Primae Noctis: The right by which a lord might sleep the first night with the bride of a newly married serf, although the custom might be avoided by the payment of a fine.
Black Canons: a common name for
Commutation: Conversion of the value of labor services into a monetary payment.
Gules of August: The first day of August.
Pallium: a yoke-shaped band of white wool, embroidered with crosses, worn by the pope and also by some archbirshops, symbolizing in the latter case the delegation to them of metropolitan jurisdiction over the other bishops of their province. It was conferred by the pope and normally had to be collected from Rome in person.
Archdeacon: subordinate of a bishop with responsibility for supervising the diocesan clergy and holding ecclesiastical courts within hisarchdeaconry.
Bascinet: A globular pointed helmet of the fourteenth and fifteenth centuries. A relatively light helmet, usually tapering to a point at the top, and with or without a visor.
Merchet: Fee paid by a villein to his lord for liberty to give his daughter in marriage.
Buttery (Middle English botelerie): store room for beer, wine, and the like.
Anathema: condemnation of heretics, similar to major excommunication. It inflicts the penalty of complete exclusion from Christian society.
Liturgical Colors: blue for Advent; white for Christmas and the octave of the Epiphany; blue or white for St. John's Day; red for the Feast of the Innocents; red or white for Circumcision. From the octave of the Epiphany to Septuagesima red was worn. From Septuagesima to Passion Sunday probably blue was used. Red was worn from Passion Sunday and Advent, except on Low Sunday and the octave of the Ascension, when white was worn. Color for the Apostles and Martyrs was red, for the Virgins who were not Martyrs, white; for the Confessors blue or green. Funerals were to be in black.
Lectio divina: "sacred reading," i.e., the reading of the Scriptures and the Fathers prescribed by the Rule of St. Benedict as one of the most important occupations of the monastic day.
Pledging: Legal institution by which one village served as guaranty for another's court appearance, veracity, good conduct, payment of debt, etc.
Obit: a memorial mass celebrated annually on the mind-day of a deceased person, usually the anniversary of his death.
Sewery: A store-room for provisions, linen, and other table-furniture.
Springald: War engine of the catapult type, employing tension.
Dilapidations: payments due on the vacating of a benefice to make good any damage sustained by Church property during the previous incumbency.
Fine: A sum of money paid to the Crown to obtain some grant, concession, or privilege. Unlike Amercement, a fine was not a monetary penalty, although failure to offer and pay a customary fine for some right would undoubtedly lead to an amercement.
Baudekyn: Textile fabric of rich silk and gold tissue.
Egret: a heron with long white plumes.
Standard-of-mail: A collar of mail to protect the neck; the collar of plate or gorget superseded it.
Cuir-bouilli: Leather boiled in oil to render it easier to mold into shapes.
St.-John's-Wort: a plant with brownish stalks and small, narrow leaves; the latter were used in salads and pounded into oil for healing wounds. The seeds have such a resinous odor, it was believed that if evil spirits were to take a whiff of it, they would be driven away.
Gadlings: Spikes, or knobs, on the knuckles of gauntlets.
Quadragesima: literally "the fortieth": the Latin term for Lent, a period of approximately forty days (in fact forty-six days) before Easter.
Haye-bote: The right to take wood or thorns for the repair of fences granted to the peasant by the lord. The hedges are growing-hedges, which were lopped at interval to provide faggots. The right to them constituted one of the woodland-rights attached to a manor, or to land held of it. Timber-trees growing in such hedges on serfs'-holdings belonged to the manor, and were jealously watched.
Armet: A close helmet with beavor and movable visor. A form of helmet introduced in the fifteenth century, the bottom portion of which opened sideways on hinges and the weight of which was distributed onto the shoulders rather than being concentrated on the top of the head.
Sweet Powder (Pouder Douce): probably the ground sweet aromatic spices such as aniseed, fennel seed, and nutmeg; there is no indication that these spices were blended with sugar.
Pardoner: a person holding a papal license to sell indulgences or pardons.
Mural: An embattled crown or garland bestowed on the first soldier to scale the walls of a besieged town.
Claid Caol: A small sword (Gaelic).
Ducal Coronet: A coronet similar to that of a duke but having four instead of eight strawberry leaves set about a rim. It is often used in place of a crest wreath but does not indicate rank.
Boon-work: Obligation of tenants for special work services, notably the lord's harvest. A day's work given gratuitously to a lord by his men on a special occasion.
Annulet: A ring.
Primogeniture: The right of the eldest son to inherit the estate or office of his father.
Fustian: A cotton or woolen cloth.
Enceinte: An enclosing wall, usually exterior, of a fortified place.
Good Powders: potent ground spices
Broigne: A shirt of mail.
Regaurdant: Used of a creature looking back over its shoulder.
Gite: A gown.
Chancery: the secretarial office of a king or bishop.
Spandrel: triangular surface area between the apexes of two arches.
Counterchanged: A way of describing a partitioned shield where the metal and color on one side of the partition line are reversed on the other side.
Mouling: relief ornamentation.
Trebuchet: War engine developed in the Middle Ages employing counterpoise.
Keep: See donjon.
Ennoblement: When a hitherto bourgeois family is raised to the ranks of the nobility by a reigning sovereign, it at the same time receives a coat of arms.
Extents: The formal recitation and valuation of the various lands of a manor, and also of the services, rents, profits, etc. of the same.
Berm: Flat space between the base of the curtain wall and the inner edge of the moat.
Benefit of Clergy: a privilege enjoyed by members of the clergy, including tonsured clerks, placing them beyond the jurisdiction of secular courts.
Fines: The commonest fine on land was a sum exacted by the lord from the person who was about to enter on tenancy of a serf-holding, lands held in "villeinage." Its amount was generally settled by bargain between lord and serf. Such holding afterwards became copyholds.
Codpiece: A protective cup fitted at the crotch of leg armor.
Locket: A metal or leather band on a scabbard.
Martlet: A bird resembling a house martin but having no feet; a popular charge in the Netherlands, and in England it is a mark of the fourth son.
Unguled: Used of the hooves of certain animals when of a different tincture from the body.
Woodland rights: The only fuel was wood or charcoal; farm buildings and cottages were of wood; cattle were kept off the otherwise unprotected common fields and meadows by hurdles [dead hedges]: so much so, that in manorial deeds of the period the cattle-herd is most commonly styled the hayward, i.e., hedge-ward. Wood, of course, had other uses. In Essex Review, xiii, 219, we read, "A common material for filling in spaces between studs of wallings was stiff clay, mixed with dry cut grass, bedded on a foundation of hazel sticks, and faced with rough lime stucco on the outside, and floated with fine mortar inside."
Noviciate: the period of training undergone by a recruit before taking monastic vows.
Hose: Chausses.
Manor: A small holding, typically 1200-1800 acres, with its own court and probably its own hall, but not necessarily having a manor house. The manor as a unit of land was generally held by a knight (knight's fee0 or managed by a bailiff for some other holder.
Griffin: A mythical beast whose upper body resembles that of an eagle, but with pointed ears, and the lower part that of a lion.
Infangenethef: Right to prosecute thieves caught in the act within the territory and to confiscate their goods.
Field of Royal Prerogative: A completely red field appearing in some royal arms, recalling the red banner of feudalism.
Super-pellicum: a loosely fitting white linen vestment, with wide sleeves.
Wormwood: a strong-smelling plant with white or yellow flowers used in the Middle Ages as an aid to healthful digestion; the expression "as bitter as wormwood" attests to the extreme bitterness of all parts of the plant.
Cap: the distinctive head-dress of doctors, round or square. The square shape was made of four different pieces of material joined, wit a small point at the top. Eventually became the mortar-board of modern university garb. Small point of the original pileus became the modern tassel.
Forebuilding: A projection in front of a keep or donjon, containing the stairs to the main entrance.
Heushire: House rent.
Pilaster: shallow pier attached to a wall.
Arpent: a measure of land roughly equal to a modern acre.
Ceorl: A free man in Anglo-Saxon law.
Brayette: Steel petticoat or skirt of overlapping bands. Little Brayettes, small plates added at bottom center front.
Apparitor: a summoner; an officer of an ecclesiastical court whose duty it was to cite persons to appear before it.
Camail: Head mail or armor; mail protection depending from the lower edge of the bascinet.
Cannon: The tubular vambrace.
Rue: a plant with yellow flowers whose bitter-tasting leaves were used mostly in herbal cures but occasionally in salads. Gerard notes that "the juice of Rue made hot in the rinde of a pomegranat and dropped into the eares, takes away the pain thereof."
Amice: a square of white linen, folded diagonally, worn by the celebrant priest, on the head or about the neck and shoulders.
steward: Manager of an estate or a household.
Leirwite: Fine levied against an unmarried woman for sexual misconduct.
Agrafe: A large brooch for fastening cloak or robe.
Inescutcheon: Used of a small shield borne in the center of another shield.
Tithing: Unit of ten or twelve village men mutually responsible for each other's conduct.
Hoarding: A temporary wooden balcony suspended from the tops of walls and towers before a battle, from which missiles and arrows could be dropped or fired accurately toward the base of the wall.
Breche: Breeches.
Squire: Knight-aspirant.
Hamade: A bar coupled (i.e., not touching the edge of the shield).
Bay: division of a building, usually by piers, buttresses, fenestration, or vaulting.
Bovates: An ox-gang, or as much land as an ox could plough in a year; varying in amount from 10 to 18 acres according to the system of tillage.
Spiked Mace: The correct blazon for a war mace covered with spikes, to distinguish it from the civic mace.
Antiphon: a sentence, or versicle, from Scripture, sung as an introduction to a psalm or canticle.
Cuirass: Body armor, originally of leather, afterwards of plate, particulary aimed at protecting the chest and back.
Mascle: A voided lozenge (i.e., a lozenge with its inside cut out parallel to the edge).
Jupon: A sleeveless, tight-fitting cloak made of layers of cloth.
Enfile: Encircle or environ.
Relief: This was a sum paid by a tenant entering possession of a freehold, whether by succession or purchase. At times it seems to have been fixed by bargain between lord and tenant. At Garsington, before taking over lands held by quit-rent of half-a-marc, the new tenants bargained that "it hit hapnit that relef sholde be gife therof, thei sholde not gife but 1 besaunde of golde for relefe." The gold bezant was perhaps worth a marc and a half (1).
Mangonel: A form of catapult.
Guardant: Used of heraldic animals which are looking out at the spectator.
Quarter: Unit of volume, eight bushels.
Chamfer: A surface formed by paring off an angle.
Sollerets: The overlapping plates forming the mailed shoe of a knight.
Hyssop: a blue-flowered plant of the mint family whose leaves cut the grease in fatty meats and fish. According to one medieval treatise, "when eaten it improves weak sight, relieves asthma, and expels worms, but causes miscarriage."
Fess Point: The center point of the shied.
Buttress: projecting mass of masonry, giving additional support to a wall.
Panel-tracery: see Tracery.
Dexter: The heraldic term for right. The dexter side of a shield is the right side of the barrer; i.e., the left side as seen by the spectator.
Arch-brace: curved timbers inserted to strengthen other members in a roof.
Prebendary: one in receipt of the revenues attached to a canonry in a cathedral or collegiate church.
Bond men: In transfers of land it is usual to mention the serfs or neifs, not infrequently by name, as handed over with their families, their lands, and all their property, to the new owner. Thus, at King's Clere in Hampshire, "for 8 shillings of sterlynges yerly" Godstow abbey transferred to Nicholas of Clere "John i-called Aylmer, sumtyme her bondeman, with all hys goodys and catall and londis."
Aisle: lateral division of the nave or chancel of a church.
Scriptorium: room in a monastery set aside for the use of scribes copying manuscripts.
Bend: An ordinary consisting of a band running diagonally across the shield from dexter chief to sinister base. A small bend is a bendlet.
Apparels: small rectangular pieces of embroidered stuff, used as ornaments to the alb and amice.
Coffin: a mold of pastry for a pie.
Bailey: Courtyard.
Jambes: Shin and calf plates.
Shakefork: Shown as a Y, the ends pointed and not touching the edge of the shield.
Pallets: Plates that protect the armpits. They superseded the mail gusset. In heraldry a narrow pale.
Baluster: A short shaft, such as is used in balustrades, usually thicker in the middle than at the ends.
Sheriff: The official who was the chief administrative and judicial officer of a shire. Many of his jobs were taken over by the itenerant justice, coroner, and justice of the peace. He collected taxes and forwarded them to the exchequer after taking his share. Also responsible for making sure the king's table was well stocked while the king was in his county.
Postern: Secondary gate or door.
Quoins: Dressed corner-stones.
Michaelmass: Feast of St. Michael on September 29.
Surplice: a loosely fitting white linen vestment, with wide sleeves.
Custody: in the Franciscan Order, the subdivision of a province.
Oblation: an offering to Church funds.
Barbute: A basinet without a visor or beaver, the sides and back of which reached the shoulders and folded like a curtain behind the neck. It was completely open in the front from the eyes down.
Avoidance: the vacating of a benefice.
Carnet: The visor.
Asylum: also called Right of Sanctuary. The right of a bishop to protect a fugitive or intercede on his behalf. Once asylum has been granted, the fugitive cannot be removed before a month has passed. Fugitives who find asylum must pledge an oath of adjuration never to return to the realm, after which they are free to find passage to the borders of the realm by the fastest way. If found within the borders after a month's time, they may be hunted down as before with no right of asylum to be granted ever again.
Howden: A college of secular priests.
Caput baroniae: Chief seat of a gentle family.
Bream: a European fresh-water fish related to the carp; any of various salt-water fishes, as the sea bream.
Nones: the liturgical office sung or recited at the ninth hour of the day, i.e., about 3 p.m.
Penitentiary: an ecclesiastical officer concerned with the administration of penance in the diocese.
Phoenix: A mythical bird, often depicted resembling an eagle, with outstretched wings, issuing from flames.
Conduit: pipe or channel for conveying water.
Weeper: a sculptured mourning figure, often shown hooded, set against the side of a tomb-chest.
Wyvern: A dragon without hind legs (i.e., more serpentine).
Great Hall: the building in the inner ward that housed the main meeting and dining area for the castle's residents.
House-bote: The right of a tenant to take wood from his lord's estate for the repair of his house.
Aiglets: Little wings; metal tips sheathing the ends of the laces or points used for tying the different parts of a costume together.
Ameure: A dagger.
Sacrist: monastic official responsible for the safekeeping of books, vestments and vessels, and for the maintenance of the monastery's buildings.
Acroc: A hook or clasp.
Anelace: A heavy, broad-bladed, sharp-pointed, double-edged knife, worn primarily by civilians.
Strainer arch: arch inserted across the space between two walls, to stop them leaning.
Pannage: The payment made to the lord for the privilege of feeding beasts in the woods about the village.
Chief: 1. The upper third of a shield. 2. A shortened form of chief shield.
Distraint: Summons or arrest.
Cuirie: A body defence of leather, a cuirass.
Reversions: Holdings returned to the lord after the death of a life-rentor.
Garderobe: individual lavatory in a medieval building.
Doublet: This short tunic was originally made of double material with padding inside. It was tight fitting.
Bar Gemel: Two narrow bars close together.
Battlement: Wall-walk, passage behind the parapet of a castle wall.
Barriers: The division of wood which separated combatants in foot jousts.
Ailettes: Little wings; metal tips sheathing the ends of the laces or points used for tying the different parts of a costume together.
Boson: An arrow with a blunt point.
Third Penny: The local earl's one third share of fines in shire or hundred courts, often given afterwards to a manor or church as income.
Soke: A right of jursidiction claimed by some manorial lords.
Louvre: opening in the roof of a room to let the smoke escape.
Aguinia: Machines or engines of war.
Brassarts: Steel plates for the upper arms (rere-braces) and forearms (vambraces), including elbow-cop.
Earl: Count; highest English title in the Middle Ages. Word is related to Jarl. Also known in earlier times as Ealdorman.
Penstock: sluice for regulating the flow of water through a channel.
Roundel: A disk; different colored roundels have their own special names (e.g., plate, pomeis, torteau, etc.).
Aquebajulus: a holy-water clerk.
Flanks: The lateral thirds of a shield. English heraldic flanks are arched.
Botton: A button or buckle for fastening the gorget to the breast piece.
Cuisses: Thigh armor.
Surmounted: One charge laid over another.
Battlement: Narrow wall built along the outer edge of the wall walk
Forfeiture: The right of a feudal lord to recover a fief when a vassal failed to honor his obligations under the feudal contract.
Crozier: The badge of abbots and bishops, derived from the shepherd's crook.
Canonical Hours: the services sung or recited at the fixed times of the day: matins, lauds, prime, tierce, sext, none, vespers, compline.
Lodged: A synonym for couchant but only used in respect of animals of the deer species.
Pegasus: The mythical winged horse which with the advent of humanism became a symbol of poetic inspiration, and also penetrated into heraldry.
Thurible: a censer; a vessel, usually of metal, for the burning of incense.
Merlon: The high part of the square "sawtooth" between crenels in a battlement.
Romanesque: term applied to the style of architecture which flourished in Europe from the early tenth to the late twelfth century; also called Norman in England.
Half-timber: The common form of medieval construction in which walls were made of a wooden frame structure filled with wattle and daub.
Double Monastery: Combined monastery for men and women but sexually separated. Ruled by either an abbotor abbess.
Retro-quire: chapel or part of a church east of the high altar, commonly used as the location for the shrine of a saint.
Bille: A charge consisting of a small rectangle, usually used in large numbers to cover a field, which is then known as billitey.
Love-day (Dies amoris): Opportunity given litigants to reconcile differences.
Sake and soke: A right of jurisdiction claimed by some manorial lords.
Embrasure: The low segment of the alternating high and low segments of a battlement.
Dalmatic: a wide-sleeved vestment, slit on each side of the skirt, and marked by two stripes. Worn by deacons and bishops; also by kings and emperors at their coronation. Originally used in the province of Dalmatia.
Back Sword: Sword with single-edged blade.
Rocket: mildly pungent plant grown like spinach and eaten in salads. According to Boorde, rocket "doth increase the seede of man, and doth stimulate the flesshe, and doth helpe to dygestyon." Also known as arugula.
Tertiary: a member of a Third Order, a confraternity of lay people attached to the friars, who bound themselves to follow certain religious observances of the friars, including recreation of the day hours of the divine office.
Chapter-house: room in which monks met daily, to discuss business and to hear a chapter of the monastic rule.
Waterleaf: broad, leaf-shaped motif with a tied-ribbon effect at the top; commonly used to decorate capitals in the twelfth century.
feud: Land or revenue-producing property granted by a lord in return for a vassal's service.
Issuant: Used of a charge emerging from a line or border.
Cesspit: The opening in a wall in which the waste from one or more garderobes was collected.
Hall: Principal living quarters of a medieval castle or house.
Hammer-beam: horizontal beam projecting from the top of a wall to support arch-braces, struts and rafters.
Bouchette: Buckle fastening the lower part of the breastplate to the upper one.
Minorite: a Friar Minor or Franciscan.
Balk: Turf left unplowed to provide separation between strips. A ridge left between two furrows, or a strip of ground left unploughed as a boundary line between two ploughed portions.
Simony: the offence of offering or receiving money to influence an appointment to ecclesiastical office.
Banner: 1. Poetic expression for flags in general. 2. In a narrower sense, an armorial flag. 3. A hanging standard or flag. In the strictest sense, a banner is bestowed on the bearer under specific conditions and cannot therefore be readily exchanged for a copy of the same design. For this reason it is usually fixed permanently to the staff.
Herald: Originally a messenger and maker of proclamations, the heralds became involved with armory by necessity. His functions on the medieval battlefield combined those of ambassador and armorial expert.
Baldrick: An ornamental belt to carry the sword.
Leywrite: Fine paid by unchaste bondwoman, normally when discovered to be pregnant but unmarried.
Colee: Traditional blow administered to the newly made knight at his dubbing.
Sanctuary: right of protection to fugitives within a church, or occasionally within the precinct of a monastery or cathedral.
Misericord: a special apartment in a monastery, for the use of monks receiving special indulgences in respect of diet and discipline; also a bracket on the underside of the hinged seat of a choir-stall, which, when the seat is turned up, gives some support to a person standing.
Vair: There are two principal furs used in heraldry, of which vair is one. It consists of the skins of small squirrels joined head to tail.
Procuration: a customary payment extracted from incumbents in lieu of their obligation to entertain a visiting bishop, archdeacon, or other high ecclesiastic.
Strong Powder (Pouder Fort): probably ground ginger or a blend of cinnamon and mace; the blend may have included any of the pungent spices such as cubeb, pepper, or clove.
Clustered-shaft: see Pier.
Arcon: The saddle-bow.
Gorget: A steel collar, used in fifteenth-century armor.
Vert: The color green in heraldry.
Alberia: A shield without armorial bearings.
Filiation: a monastic organization that made each monastery responsible for supervising its daughter foundations; a group of abbeys linked in this way to a common mother-house; a system developed by the Cistercians.
Paunce: Plate armor for the body.
Gable: vertical triangular end of a building from the eaves to the apex.
Powder: ground spice.
Rose Window: see Wheel Window.
Vault: an arched stone roof.
Panther: A mythical beast.
Throughout: Used of a charge touching the edge of the shield, which does not normally do so.
Claid Heamh: A sword (Gaelic).
Mill-rind: A charge similar to a crampon representing the iron which supports a millstone; it is pierced in the center to take the spindle of the millstone.
Sacring: the consecration of the elements (hence "sacring bell" and "sacring torch").
Screens: Wooden partition at the kitchen end of a hall, protecting a passage leading to the buttery, pantry, and kitchen.
Diasarmed: Used of an animal or bird deprived of its weapons (e.g., an eagle without beak or claws).
Charter: Official document, usually deed or grant of privilege.
Homage and Fealty: A body of persons owning allegiance, and attending a manorial court. Homage was the formal recognition by a tenant on entering the fee that he held the land of the lord and owed him service and submission for it. Fealty was the oath taken by a tenant on entering the fee that he would be true to the lord. Homage was rendered by the tenant holding "his hands together betweene the hands of his Lord," fealty by the tenant "holding his right hand upon a booke," but practically there seems little difference between the two. On doing fealty, a fee had to be paid to the steward of the manor.
Cantref: a Welsh political and administrative division, similar to the English shire.
Flag: The generic term for any decorative piece of materials fixed loosely to a staff and not necessarily of armorial significance.
Chasuble: a sleeveless mantle, worn over the alb and stole by a celebrant priest.
Shaft: small or subordinate pillar.
Dongjon: The inner stronghold of a castle, usually found in one of the towers.
Eyre: Royal circuit court ("justices in eyre" [Lat. in itinere, on a journey]).
Fair: A market held at regular intervals, usually once or twice a year. Fairs tend to offer a wider range of goods than normal markets. They are generally licensed by either the king, the local lord, or a chartered town.
Ad opus: Status of villeins owing labor services.
Confection: the sugar paste in which whole spices were dipped; confectioned spices were used as garnishes and eaten at the end of feasts, to aid digestion.
Cubeb: a berry from Java which resembles peppercorn and tastes somewhat like allspice.
Ad censum: Status of villeins who pay a cash rent in lieu of labor services.
Vulned: In heraldry, wounded.
Potent: The ancient name for a crutch, shown heraldically as a charge in the form of a T.
Cingulum: The military belt of a knight or gentleman.
Processional: an office-book, giving the text of the hymns, psalms, and litanies used in ecclesiastical processions.
Torteau: A red roundel.
Cantle: The rear peak of the saddle.
Brunt: The front or peytral of a horse-trapper.
Cruet: a vessel, usually one of a pair, for holding the wine or the water at the Eucharist.
Kirtle: Tunic.
Bamberges: Armor for the lower part of the leg.
Medkniche: A haymaker's fee, viz. as much hay as the hayward can lift with his middle finger to his knees.
Bylaws: Rules made by open-field villagers governing cultivation and grazing.
Almuce: large cape, often with attached hood, of cloth turned down over the shoulders and lined with fur. Doctors of Divinity and canons wore it lined with gray fur. Cape was edged with little Ambulatory - aisle leading round an apse, usually encircling the choir of a church.
Plover: a shore bird with a short tail, long pointed wings, and brown or gray feathers mixed with white.
Crook: bishop's pastoral staff. The word meant originally the bearer of a crook and is in no way connected with cross, though the words have been confused.
Dowry: in monastic use, a gift of land or an entrance fee, normally extracted by a nunnery as a condition of accepting a new member. Canon law forbade the exaction of dowry, but permitted voluntary gifts. In the case of men's houses, it was normal practice for a postulant to bring an endowment with him.
Sheriff's tourn: The turn or circuit made by the sheriff of a county twice a year, in which he presided at the hundred-court in each hundred of the county.
Cartulary: a book or register containing copies of the deeds or charters relating to the lands, churches and other properties of a monastery, or of any other establishment.
sally-port: Secondary gate or door.
Master-general: the head of the Order of Preachers or Dominican Friars.
Combatant: Use when two rampant figures face each other as if in combat.
Mazer: a bowl or drinking-cup.
Fountain: A roundel barry wavy argent and azure.
Elevation: vertical stages by which the architecture of a wall is erected.
Launder: A person (of either sex) who washes linen.
Antelope: The heraldic antelope has serrated horns, a beak, tufts on the body, and a lion's tail.
Rochet: a white-linen vestment, similar to a surplice.
Cappa: a gown sewn down the front except or a short slit in the front middle which enabled hands to emerge, worn mostly by regents in theology, arts and law during lectures.
Canton: An ordinary consisting of a small square in the dexter chief of the shield.
Fret: A voided lozenge interlaced by a bendlet and a bendlet sinister.
Canted: inclined, or angled.
Pinched: plaited.
Guyders: Straps to fasten the various pieces that went to make up the suit of plate armor.
Dove-houses: The right to have a dove-house, or culver-house (from culver, an old word for pigeon) was a manorial right, very oppressive to the lord's neighbors, from damage done to their crops. In An Alphabet of Tales [ed. M. M. Banks, E.E.T.S. 1904) there is a quaint tale illustrative of the feeling against pigeon-houses. The passion for hawking largely explains their existence. Accordingly, the dove-house is often separately mentioned in the conveyance of an estate.
Volant: Flying.
Seigneurial: lordly, pertaining to a feudal lord.
Pentise: covered way, or small subsidiary building, with a sloping roof.
Calefactory: warming-room in a monastery.
Bavier: So called from its resemblance to a bib. Protective piece covering the chin. It was usually attached to the bottom of the helmet, at times with a hinge.
Indulgences: a commutation of a certain period of canonical penance, authorized by a bishop, enabling the penitent who had repented and confessed his sin to substitute for his penance Hymnary - a hymn-book, or hymnal.
Haketon: A variety of gambeson, said to have been of buckskin stuffed with cotton.
Warden: a hard pear with blackish bruises; prepared by baking or stewing.
Tench: a European fresh-water fish of the carp family.
Jazerine: Light armor or small plates, or splints, of metal, riveted together or to some strong material.
Putlog Hole: A hole intentionally left in the surface of a wall for insertion of a horizontal pole.
Yoke: A measurement of land in Kent equal to one quarter of a Sulong.
Eremetical: the mode of monastic life followed by hermits, either singly or in groups, from the Greek eremos, meaning a desert, as opposed to monastic life in community.
Garth: the open central space, normally a quadrilateral, enclosed by a cloister.
Ancient Demesne: Land which was the king's land at the time of the Domesday Book.
Codling: a young or small cod, perhaps salted; Furnivall notes that "ling" may be a corruption of "lying" in salt.
Claustral Prior: the abbot's second-in-command, responsible for the internal life of the monastery.
Woodcock: a small migratory game bird related to the snipe and sandpiper.
Enfeoffment: Investiture with dignities or possessions
Kettle-hat: A half-helmet resembling an inverted kettle or pot with a brim and sometimes with the sides converging to a ridge along the top and back.
Loach: a small European fresh-water fish of the carp family.
Quartering: A segment of the armorial shield which may be smaller than an actual quarter. Each quartering represents arms inherited from a different branch of the armiger's family.
Ciborium: a chalice-shaped vessel, with a lid, for the consecrated bread (the reserved Host).
Helps: Certain ancient customary charges, by which, the lord of a manor asked contributions from his tenants to meet the expense of making his eldest son a knight, and of providing a marriage portion for his daughter.
Curia: Courtyard.
Hamsoken: Assault in the victim's own house.
Groining: The angular edges formed by the intersection of vaults in a ceiling.
Cassock: a long coat reaching almost to the ground and fastened up the front, with fairly tight sleeves. Worn by men, both lay and clerical. Often fur lined since its main purpose was to keep wearer warm. Was worn under the eucharistic vestments but is completely covered by the alb so that it does not show.
Homage: A body of persons owning allegiance, and attending a manorial court.
Ciclaton: A tight fitting surcoat shorter in front than behind.
Purslane: a plant with a pinkish fleshy stem and small, round leaves; the leaves were used as a potherb or in salads. Boorde informs us that "purslane dothe extynct the ardor of lassyvyousnes, and doth mytygate great heate in all the inwarde partes of man."
Lozengy: Used of a field divided in a diagonal criss-cross pattern to give a series of lozenges.
Canting Arms: Arms which make a pun or play on words involving the name of the bearer.
Suit: Attendance.
Ban: a king's power to command prohibit under pain of punishment or death; used mainly because of a break in the King's Peace. Also a royal proclamation, either of a call to arms or a decree of outlawry. In ecclesiastical terms, an excommunication on condemnation by the Church.
Austin: the English form of the name "Augustinian" as in "Austin Friars."
Appropriation: the formal transfer to a monastic house of the tithes and other endowments of a parish church, agreed usually in return for the promise to keep a vicar on the proceeds.
Carrels: divisions of a chamber or cloister walk into individual study areas.
Almonry: place from which alms were dispensed to the poor.
Censuarius: Tenant ad censum.
Vol: A French term for two wings joined at the base with the tips upward.
Couchant: Lying down but with head erect.
Selion: A ridge or narrow strip lying between two furrows formed in dividing an open field.
Tonsure: monastic hairstyle: shaving the top of the head and leaving a ring of hair around the side, indicated that a young man had received clerical status.
Tally: A notched stick, which was split in two, one half being kept by the seller and the other half by the receiver.
Vicar: the incumbent of a parish church which has been appointed to a monastery or some other ecclesiastical body which receives the great tithe. The vicar receives a fixed portion of the endowments of the parish and offerings.
Fesswise: Running horizontally across the center of the shield.
Aid: A special obligation of a vassal to provide money for such occasions as his lord's ransom, the marriage of his daughter, the knighting of his son, or for going on Crusade.
Pale: An ordinary consisting of a broad vertical band down the central third of the shield.
Diapered (Damasked) : A field so described has its plain surface broken up by patterns executed in a lighter or darker shade of the same color.
Proctor: a legal representative of any person or bodies of persons able to act for them in ecclesiastical courts.
Orle: A decorated wreath, worn round the bascinet in fifteenth-century armor. Also in heraldry used of a charge standing away from the edge of the shield by its own width.
Stinting: Limiting, especially the rights of pasture.
Sea: Prefix to indicate a creature with fish tail.
Curtilage: A small court, yard, or piece of ground attached to a dwelling-house, and forming one enclosure with it.
Solo-piece: projecting base for roof trusses, etc., at the level of the wall-top.Soul-scot - a mortuary, or offering made to the priest on behalf of a deceased parishioner.
Ring: Unit of volume, four bushels.
Thyrtel: Knife or dagger.
Beltane Eve: the night of April 30, one of the two times of the year when mortal rules are believed to be suspended and supernatural events are common. Sometimes called May Day Eve.
Decorated: term applied to the style of Gothic architecture which flourished in England from about 1280 to 1340.
Engrailed: A scalloped line of partition, the points of the scalloping pointing outward.
Arming Bonnet: A padded cap worn under the helmet.
Coudiere: Elbow-piece.
Penitential: a treatise setting out the penances, or acts of satisfaction, appropriate to various sins, which a penitent was required to perform after he had repented and confessed his faults to a priest. Similarly, the section of a monastic Rule that prescribed penances for various faults or breaches of monastic discipline.
Furlong: Plot of arable land, subdivision of a field.
Ogee: arch with a steep projection at the apex.
Agraffes: Hooks and eyes used for armor and also for ordinary costume.
Ancilla: A female slave.
Court-leet: A court held periodically (at least once a year, on a day in Eastertide or Whitsuntide, according to the custom of the manor) in a lordship or manor, before the lord or his steward, having jurisdiction over petty offences and the civil affairs of the district. The Court Leet represented a measure of the king's authority, delegated to the lord of the manor. It controlled brewers, bakers, butchers, shoemakers, and other tradesmen; judged and punished cases of larceny, assault, and breach of the peace; punished persons who obstructed roads or blocked rights of way, or neglected to repair roads or bridges.
Herring-bone pattern: The placing of stones aslant in a wall so that each two rows form a succession of angles resembling the backbone of a herring.
Parted: The term used to signify that a field is divided into different segments.
Grains of Paradise: the aromatic pungent seeds of a tropical West African plant. Boorde says, "Graynes be good for the stomake and the head." Grains are related to cardamom.
Bishop's Mantle: A cape of mail.
Copyhold: The late medieval form of customary tenure, the copy of the court roll entry of admission to a holding serving as the tenant's title-deed.
Courant: Running.
Gardcorp: An outdoor garment worn by men and women.
Heaume: A heavy helmet without movable visor and only an eye-slit or occularium, mostly used for tilting.
Cure: cure of souls; the spiritual charge of parishioners (hence "curate").
Woodward: Manorial official in charge of the lord's woodland.
Supporters: Usually two in number, and generally animals. They appear to support a shield, but had their origin in the fancy of early seal engravers, who thus filled up the unoccupied space in armorial seals.
Thunderbolt: Twisted bar, normally with rays of lightning behind it.
Pass Gaurd (Passe-garde): Sometimes refers to a ridge of armor guarding the neck, but may mean a large plate guarding the elbow.
Nowed: Knotted; often applied to snakes or the tails of beasts when tied in a knot.
Multure: Portion of meal or flour kept by the miller in payment for his services.
Man: In this sense to be a lord's man, to owe obligations to, in the forms of labor and service. A woman could be someone's man.
Sinister Quarter: A quarter on the sinister or left side of a shield.
Boss: decorative knob, usually covering the intersection of vaulting ribs.
Vernaccia: Vernage, a strong sweet Italian wine.
Catechumens: members of a Christian congregation being prepared for baptism or confirmation.
Sapping: Undermining, as of a castle wall.
Capellium: The sword sheath or scabbard.
Freestone: any easily carved fine-grained stone (e.g. a limestone or sandstone).
